Utah statutes.
34-19-8.   Injunctive relief -- Appeals.
Whenever any court, or judge or judges of it, shall issue or deny any
temporary injunction in a case involving or growing out of a labor dispute,
the court shall, upon the request of any party to the proceedings, and on his
filing the usual bond for costs, forthwith certify the entire record of the
case, including a transcript of the evidence taken, to the appropriate
appellate court for its review. Upon the filing of such record in the
appropriate appellate court the appeal shall be heard with the greatest
possible expedition, giving the proceeding precedence over all other matters
except older matters of the same character.
